Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 53.
FREE SCHOOL SYSTEM (CONST., ART. 14, § 1, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 1, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 4 (see Acts 1967, p. 1330) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 8, 1967. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 5, 1968, by a vote of 244,370 for and 220,057 against.